California statutes. Education Code
(a) The board shall require both of the following as conditions for receiving funding pursuant to this article:

(1) Within six months after the date of initial occupancy of the permanent school facilities constructed pursuant to this article, the school district shall remove from the eligible school, and remove from service as classrooms in the district, the portable classrooms used for determining the number of eligible pupils.

(2) The new school construction funding provided pursuant to this article shall result in a reduction in the total number of portable classrooms in the school district.

(b) This section does not preclude the school district from using the portable classrooms removed from eligible schools for child care or preschool programs, if those portable classrooms are not located at an eligible school.

(c) This section does not apply to eligible schools operating on double session schedules in an elementary school district in a county of the second class, as set forth in Section 28023 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 35, Sec. 12.   Effective May 20, 2006.   Operative after November 7, 2006, pursuant to Sec. 25 of Ch. 35 and adoption of Prop. 1D.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Emergency School Classroom Law of 1979 [17085. - 17096.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [17085. - 17096.]

17085.

This chapter may be cited as the State Relocatable Classroom Law of 1979.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17086.

In adopting this chapter, the Legislature recognizes that the ad valorem tax is no longer available as a source of revenue for the construction of necessary school facilities. The Legislature considers that the greatest need in school construction is for classrooms for the education of public school pupils. It is the intent of the Legislature to satisfy this primary need to the greatest extent possible before providing any additional educational facilities, regardless of how desirable such additional facilities may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17087.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Board” means the State Allocation Board.

(b) “Good repair” has the same meaning as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 17002.

(c) “Lessee” means a school district or county superintendent of schools to whom the board has leased a portable classroom pursuant to this chapter.

(d) “State School Building Aid Fund” means that fund established pursuant to Section 16096.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 900, Sec. 8.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17088.

In addition to any other powers and duties as are granted the board by this chapter, other statutes, or the State Constitution, the board has the power to do each of the following:

(a) Establish any qualifications not in conflict with other provisions of this chapter, as it deems will best serve the purposes of this chapter, for determining the eligibility of school districts and county superintendents of schools to lease portable classrooms under this chapter.

(b) Establish any procedures and policies in connection with the administration of this chapter as it deems necessary.

(c) Adopt any rules and regulations for the administration of this chapter requiring such procedure, forms, and information, as it may deem necessary.

(d) Have constructed, furnished, equipped, or otherwise require whatever work is necessary to place, portable classrooms on schoolsites where needed.

(e) Own, have maintained, and lease portable classrooms to qualifying school districts and county superintendents of schools.

(f) From any moneys in the State School Building Aid Fund available for purposes of this chapter, the board shall make available to the Director of General Services such amounts as it determines necessary to provide the assistance, pursuant to this chapter, required by Section 15504 of the Government Code.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, from any funds available to the board, the board may, no later than January 15 of any year, make available to the Director of General Services up to thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) for expenditure in the subsequent school year. It is the intent of the Legislature that this allocation be annually funded from an appropriation made for this purpose by the Legislature in the Budget Act for the fiscal year in which the board is to act to make that funding available. These funds shall be utilized to purchase portable classrooms for the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17088.2.

Notwithstanding any other law, the board may transfer any funds within the State School Building Aid Fund that are in excess of the amounts needed by the board for the maintenance of portable buildings or for the purchase of new portable buildings, for that fiscal year, to any of the following, as appropriate:

(a) The 1998 State School Facilities Fund for allocation by the board for any purpose authorized pursuant to that fund.

(b) The 2002 State School Facilities Fund for allocation by the board for any purpose authorized pursuant to that fund.

(c) The 2004 State School
 Facilities Fund for allocation by the board for any purpose authorized pursuant to that fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 386, Sec. 10.   (SB 436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17088.3.

(a) No school district shall qualify for the lease under this chapter, after January 1, 1990, of one or more portable classrooms except upon submitting a study examining the feasibility of implementing in the district a year-round multitrack educational program that is designed to increase pupil capacity in the district by at least 20 percent.

(b) Emergency or urgency conditions within a school district shall constitute grounds for approval by the board, pending submission of the report.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to facilities that are designated as uninhabitable after July 1, 1989, due to fire or other health or safety conditions.

(d) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a school district for leases or subleases under this chapter for the purpose of providing facilities, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17091, for licensed child day care programs or recreation or enrichment activities or programs for schoolage children.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17088.5.

(a) The board may empower any lessee to act as its agent in the performance of acts authorized under this chapter with regard to portable classrooms to be made available to that lessee, including, but not necessarily limited to, contracting for architectural and construction services and purchasing furniture and equipment.

(b) In addition, where any qualifying school district or county superintendent of schools is deemed by the board to be eligible under this chapter for the lease of portable classrooms, but adequate funds are not at that time available to the board for the purchase of those classrooms, the board may authorize the school district or county superintendent of schools to purchase portable classrooms, to the extent of that eligibility, pursuant to the following conditions:

(1) The portable classrooms are purchased under a procedure determined by the board, pursuant to either a bidding process implemented by the school district or county superintendent of schools or by the State Office of Procurement.

(2) To the extent that funding for purposes of this chapter is subsequently made available to the board, the board shall purchase the portable classroom or classrooms from the school district or county superintendent of schools, for lease to that entity under this chapter, for an amount, not to exceed the purchase price the board determines it would have paid for the classroom or classrooms at the time they were acquired pursuant to paragraph (1), as necessary to reimburse the school district or county superintendent of schools for the purchase price, less the amount that would have been charged to the school district or county superintendent of schools for the lease of the classroom or classrooms under Section 17089 from the date of purchase. The sale of the portable classroom or classrooms under this paragraph shall be at the discretion of the school district or county superintendent of schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17088.7.

(a) Any school district, or, under a joint powers agreement pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, any combination of one or more school districts or county superintendents of schools, may, to the extent of the eligibility of the school district or of the parties to the joint powers agreement to lease portable classrooms under this chapter, purchase portable classrooms as provided in this section.

(b) The number of portable classrooms which may be purchased pursuant to this section, on a statewide basis, shall not exceed 200 in any given year, and shall not exceed 600 in total. Portable classrooms purchased prior to September 22, 1989, are exempt from the yearly limit of 200, but shall be counted towards the total limit of 600.

(c) The purchase costs of the portable classrooms, which include costs of site preparation, furniture and equipment, toilet facilities as described in Section 65980 of the Government Code, and the transportation of classrooms, may be funded from revenues received by the school district or districts pursuant to Section 17620. The purchase shall comply with any procedures and policies established by the board under this chapter for the purchase of portable classrooms. All portable classrooms purchased pursuant to this section are the property of the state.

(d) The board shall lease the portable classrooms purchased pursuant to the authority granted in this section to the purchaser, as described in subdivision (a), in accordance with this chapter, including applicable eligibility standards, and the purchase costs paid shall be credited toward the rent the purchaser would otherwise be required to pay under this chapter as a lessee.

(e) In the event that the purchase of portable classrooms under this section occurs pursuant to a joint powers agreement, as described in subdivision (a), the agreement shall identify the school district or districts and county superintendent or superintendents of schools that are party to the agreement, identify the district or districts providing the revenues, specify the manner in which the revenues are to be expended, and specify the distribution of portable classrooms subsequent to purchase, which distribution shall be in accordance with the eligibility requirements of this chapter. The agreement shall be subject to approval of the board, pursuant to subdivision (b) and any applicable procedures and policies established by the board under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17089.

(a) The board shall lease portable classrooms to qualifying school districts and county superintendents of schools for not less than one dollar ($1) per year, nor more than four thousand dollars ($4,000) per year, for each portable classroom. This amount shall be annually increased according to the adjustment for inflation set forth in the statewide cost index for classroom construction, as determined by the board at its January meeting.

(b) The board shall require each lessee to undertake all necessary maintenance, repairs, renewal, and replacement to ensure that a project is at all times kept in good repair, working order, and condition. All costs incurred for this purpose shall be borne by the lessee.

(c) For purposes of this section, “good repair” has the same meaning as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 17002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 900, Sec. 9.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17089.2.

Any portable classroom that is leased from the board by a school district or county superintendent of schools under this chapter on or prior to December 1, 1991, may be purchased by that district or county superintendent of schools for an amount equal to the purchase price paid by the board, including the purchase costs specified in subdivision (c) of Section 17088.7, less the amount of any rent already paid to the board by the district or county superintendent of schools for that classroom. Payment for purchases made pursuant to this section shall be in equal annual installments for an agreed upon term not to exceed nine years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 848, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17089.5.

The board may lease portable classrooms to any school district or county superintendent of schools which serves infant or preschool individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026, and which operates programs pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000). These portable classrooms shall be adequately equipped to meet the educational needs of these students, including, but not limited to, sinks and restroom facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17090.

The board shall require lessees to insure at their own expense for the benefit of the state, any leased portable classroom which is the property of the state, against such risks, including liability from the use thereof, in such amounts as the board may deem necessary to protect the interest of the state. All payments resulting from claims made against the insurance shall be made payable to and retained by the board for deposit in the State School Building Aid Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17091.

(a) The board shall have authority to adopt rules establishing priorities for the acquisition and leasing of classrooms to those school districts and county superintendents of schools whose pupils will benefit most. The board may make exceptions from the established priorities if it determines that the pupils affected will benefit.

(b) If at any time the number of portable classrooms available exceeds the number of those required by applicant districts, as determined by basic loading standards and eligibility requirements, the board may authorize additional portable classrooms to be placed in any school district that agrees to hire an additional teacher for each additional portable classroom placed in the district pursuant to this subdivision. 

(c) If at any time the number of portable classrooms available exceeds the number of those required by applicant districts, as determined by basic loading standards and eligibility requirements, the board shall authorize additional portable classrooms to be placed in any school district, upon request of the school district, for the purpose of providing licensed child day care programs or recreation or enrichment activities or programs for schoolage children on a schoolsite, unless the surplus classrooms are needed for emergency purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17092.

(a) No portable classrooms shall be made available to any school district unless the district furnishes evidence, satisfactory to the board, that the district has no available bond proceeds that could be used for the purchase of classroom facilities.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a school district or county superintendent of schools that has received approval for a project that includes a justified number of new teaching stations pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 17000) or Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.15) shall be eligible for at least the same number of emergency portable classrooms as approved new teaching stations.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to leases or subleases under this chapter for the purpose of providing facilities, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17091, for licensed child day care programs or any recreation or enrichment activities or programs for schoolage children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 590, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17092.3.

A school district may sublease any portable classroom obtained by the district pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17091 to a private provider that has entered into a contract with the district to provide any child care and development program or programs or any recreation or enrichment activities or programs for schoolage children on a schoolsite. The terms of the sublease for rental payments and other related costs shall not exceed the costs of the portable classroom to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17093.

The board shall have prepared for its use, performance specifications for portable classrooms complying with Sections 17280 to 17314, inclusive, which are capable of being economically moved, and bids for the construction of which can be solicited from more than one responsible bidder. The board may from time to time solicit bids from, and award to, the lowest responsible competitive bidder, contracts for the construction or purchase of the number of portable classrooms it deems will be required by eligible school districts and county superintendents of schools during the next 12 months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17094.

If at any time the board determines that a lessee’s need for particular portable classrooms which were made available to the lessee pursuant to this chapter has ceased, the board may take possession of the portable classrooms and may lease them to other eligible districts or county superintendents of schools, or if there is no longer a need for any portable classrooms, the board may dispose of them to public or private parties in any manner that it deems to be in the best interests of the state.

Any revenue which is derived from a lease or other disposition of the portable classrooms pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State School Building Aid Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17095.

The State Board of Education may waive application of the penalty provisions of Section 41376 for school districts which during the school year used portable classrooms leased pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17096.

Commencing with leases entered into on or after January 1, 2000, the plans and specifications for portable classrooms funded pursuant to this chapter shall include a provision for a telephone in each portable classroom. The connection from the portable classroom to a public switched telephone network, as set forth in Section 17077.10, shall be made by the school district at the time of the installation of the building. However, a school district may meet this requirement by utilizing wireless technology equivalent to a hard-wired connection to a public switched telephone network.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 709, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. School District Revenue Bonds [17100. - 17112.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [17100. - 17100.]

17100.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund, pursuant to Section 17008, and the proceeds from the sale or lease of surplus school property are the two sources available to school districts to finance the construction of school facilities to relieve overcrowding. However, these sources are still insufficient to meet the construction needs statewide of school districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Revenue Bonds [17110. - 17112.]

17110.

The governing board of a school district may issue for sale revenue bonds to finance the construction of joint occupancy facilities as prescribed in Article 8 (commencing with Section 17515) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.5, which facilities are necessary to relieve overcrowded schools. Proceeds from the rental and lease of the facilities shall be used by the governing board to repay the revenue bonds.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “To finance the construction of joint occupancy facilities” means to offset either the cost of constructing the joint occupancy facilities or the cost of financing the construction of joint occupancy facilities, or both.

(b) “Joint occupancy facilities” means any building constructed pursuant to this chapter which is occupied jointly by a school district and a private entity specified in Section 17811 or one or more buildings which are constructed pursuant to this chapter on the same property used by the district and the private entity, but are not occupied jointly. Facilities to be acquired by purchase pursuant to this article for occupancy by pupils shall meet the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 17365) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.5.

(c) “Construction” includes acquisition by purchase.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17111.

The governing board may contract with any person, firm, partnership, joint venture, or other private entity for the purpose of issuing revenue bonds pursuant to Section 17810 and for the purpose of renting or leasing the facilities constructed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17112.

No revenue bonds may be issued for sale by the governing board unless the facilities are to be constructed on district-owned property, except as to facilities to be acquired by purchase.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Public Disclosure of Non-Voter-Approved Debt [17150. - 17150.1.]

17150.

(a) Upon the approval by the governing board of the school district to proceed with the issuance of revenue bonds or to enter into an agreement for financing school construction pursuant to Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 17170), the school district shall notify the county superintendent of schools and the county auditor. The superintendent of the school district shall provide the repayment schedules for that debt obligation and evidence of the ability of the school district to repay that obligation to the county auditor, the county superintendent, the governing board, and the public. Within 15 days of the receipt of the information, the county superintendent of schools and the county auditor may comment publicly to the governing board of the school district regarding the capability of the school district to repay that debt obligation.

(b) Upon the approval by the county board of education to proceed with the issuance of revenue bonds or to enter into an agreement for financing pursuant to Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 17170), the county superintendent of schools or superintendent of a school district for which the county board serves as governing board shall notify the Superintendent. The county superintendent of schools or the superintendent of a school district for which the county board serves as the governing board shall provide the repayment schedules for that debt obligation and evidence of the ability of the county office of education or school district to repay that obligation, to the Superintendent, the governing board, and the public. Within 15 days of the receipt of the information the Superintendent may comment publicly to the county board of education regarding the capability of the county office of education or school district to repay that debt obligation.

(c) Prior to delivery of the notice required by subdivision (a) neither the county nor its officers shall have responsibility for the administration of the indebtedness of the school district. Failure to comply with the requirements of this section will not affect the validity of the indebtedness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

17150.1.

(a) No later than 30 days before the approval by the governing board of the school district to proceed with the issuance of certificates of participation and other debt instruments that are secured by real property and do not require approval of the voters of the school district, the school district shall notify the county superintendent of schools and the county auditor. The superintendent of the school district shall provide information necessary to assess the anticipated effect of the debt issuance, including the repayment schedules for that debt obligation, evidence of the ability of the school district to repay that obligation, and the issuance costs, to the county auditor, the county superintendent, the governing board, and the public. Within 15 days of the receipt of the information, the county superintendent of schools and the county auditor may comment publicly to the governing board of the school district regarding the capability of the school district to repay that debt obligation.

(b) No later than 30 days before the approval by the county board of education to proceed with the issuance of certificates of participation and other debt instruments that are secured by real property and do not require approval of the voters of the county, the county superintendent of schools or superintendent of a school district for which the county board serves as governing board shall notify the Superintendent. The county superintendent of schools or the superintendent of a school district for which the county board serves as the governing board shall provide information necessary to assess the anticipated effect of the debt issuance, including the repayment schedules for that debt obligation, the evidence of the ability of the county office of education or school district to repay that obligation, and issuance costs, to the Superintendent, the governing board, and the public. Within 15 days of the receipt of the information the Superintendent may comment publicly to the county board of education regarding the capability of the county office of education or school district to repay that debt obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 128, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17. The Archie-Hudson and Cunneen School Technology Revenue Bond Act [17160. - 17165.]

17160.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this act to provide a source of financing for the development of California public schools’ educational technology infrastructure for the use of technology in instruction through the use of state revenue bonds repaid from a dedicated portion of funds allocated to school districts from the California State Lottery Education Fund pursuant to Section 8880.5 of the Government Code. It is further the intent of the Legislature in enacting this act to further the purposes of the California State Lottery Act of 1984 as approved by the voters on November 6, 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17161.

For the purpose of this article the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Act” means the Archie-Hudson and Cunneen School Technology Revenue Bond Act.

(b) “Authority” means the California School Financing Authority established pursuant to Section 17172.

(c) “Bond” means bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, commercial paper, and any other evidences of indebtedness.

(d) “Fund” means the School Technology Pooled Revenue Bond Fund established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17162.

(e) “School district” means school district or county office of education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17162.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 17199.3, the authority may issue bonds exclusively for the purposes of this act, provided that the total amount of bonds issued and outstanding at any time under this act shall not exceed four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000). Authorization for the issuance of bonds under this act shall become operative after July 1, 1997, upon receipt by the authority of repayment pledges made by school districts, pursuant to Section 17163, which, when the pledges from all school districts are combined, are equal to or greater than five million dollars ($5,000,000). The authority shall not issue bonds for any project that cannot be supported by the repayment pledges of school districts.

(b) In administering this act, the authority shall meet all of the requirements established by law for the issuance, holding, and repayment of revenue bonds by the authority, including those set forth in Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 17170), unless otherwise provided for in this act.

(c) Revenues from the sale of bonds issued pursuant to this act shall be deposited in the School Technology Pooled Revenue Bond Fund, which fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year for the purposes of this chapter. The authority shall allocate moneys to each participating school district from the fund.

(d) Allocations from the fund shall be used by school districts only for the purpose of establishing computer-based networks and telecommunications systems for instructional purposes, including the procurement and installation of computer hardware and software, multimedia audio, video, and data transfer equipment, and wiring, cabling, and other equipment necessary to establish network connectivity, and any planning and installation costs associated with establishing and installing the networks.

(e) The length of terms of the bonds issued pursuant to this act shall be less than the useful life of the equipment to be purchased as set forth in subdivision (d).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17163.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a school district may participate in this act, if the governing board of the school district adopts a resolution approving that participation. A participating school district shall pledge a portion of the lottery revenues allocated annually to the school district from the California State Lottery Education Fund as a dedicated revenue source to repay bonds issued by the authority under the act.

(b) A school district may pledge an amount up to the equivalent of 25 percent, but not more than 25 percent, of the allocation to the school district for the 1996–97 fiscal year from the California State Lottery Education Fund.

(c) A participating school district shall guarantee the repayment of bonds issued under this chapter by providing instructions to the Controller as follows:

(1) Informs the Controller of its election to participate in this act.

(2) Authorizes the Controller to pay the portion of the school district’s annual allocation of funds from the California State Lottery Education Fund to the bond trustee identified by the school district for the repayment of the school district’s share of the bonds issued under this chapter.

(3) Contains a transfer schedule that sets forth the amounts of funds, which shall be equal to the amount of funds pledged pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section, to be transferred by the Controller to the trustee from the funds to be allocated to that school district from the California State Lottery Education Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17163.5.

The Controller shall pay bond trustees in accordance with the instructions received pursuant to Section 17863. The Controller shall make that payment only from moneys in the California State Lottery Education Fund allocated to that school district. The Controller is not authorized to pay a bond trustee any amount in excess of a district’s allocation from the California State Lottery Education Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17164.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed or construed to create or constitute a debt, liability, or a loan or pledge of the credit of the state.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, should lottery funds pledged to repay bonds issued pursuant to this act be insufficient to repay the revenue bonds, negotiable notes, or negotiable bond anticipation notes sold to finance projects and related interest and expenses, moneys in the General Fund shall not be available as an alternative source of repayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17165.

The State Department of Education shall include in its annual survey of schools on the use of lottery funds, the amount of lottery revenues expended to repay bonds issued pursuant to this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. California School Finance Authority [17170. - 17199.6.]

17170.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California School Finance Authority Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17171.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that it is in the interest of the state and its people for the state to do all of the following:

(a) Reconstruct, remodel, or replace existing school buildings that are educationally inadequate or that do not meet current structural safety requirements.

(b) Acquire new schoolsites and buildings to be made available to school districts, charter schools, and community college districts for the pupils of the public education system, which is a matter of general concern inasmuch as the education of the state’s children is an obligation and function of the state.

(c) Assist school districts and community college districts by providing access to financing for working capital and capital improvements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 325, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17172.

There is in the state government the California School Finance Authority. The authority is a public instrumentality, and the exercise by the authority of the powers conferred by this chapter is an essential public function.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17173.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings, unless the context indicates or requires another or different meaning or intent:

(a) “Act” means the California School Finance Authority Act.

(b) “Agent” means a county or city board of education or superintendent of schools acting with the board’s consent, on behalf of one or more school districts for any purpose of this chapter, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges or the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges acting with the Board of Governors’ consent, on behalf of one or more community college districts for any purpose of this
 chapter, and the school district, county office of education, or other chartering entity acting with the consent of, and on behalf of, one or more charter schools for any purpose of this chapter.

(c) “Authority” means the California School Finance Authority, or any board, body, commission, department, or officer succeeding to the principal functions of the authority, or to which the powers conferred upon the authority by this chapter shall be given by law.

(d) “Bonds” or “revenue bonds” means bonds, notes, lease obligations, certificates of participation, commercial paper, and any other evidences of indebtedness.

(e) “Certificate of participation” means an undivided interest in one or more bonds, leases, loans, installment
 sales, or other agreements of a participating party or parties.

(f) “Charter school” means a school established pursuant to Part 26.8 (commencing with Section 47600) of Division 4 of Title 2.

(g) “Cost,” as applied to all or part of a project financed or refinanced pursuant to this chapter, means and includes all or any part of the cost of any of the following:

(1) Construction.

(2) Acquisition or improvement of all lands, structures, real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and interests acquired or used for a project.

(3) Demolition or removal of any buildings or
 structures on land acquired for a project, including the acquisition of any lands to which the buildings or structures may be moved.

(4) All machinery and equipment.

(5) Financing or refinancing charges, including, but not limited to, credit enhancement costs, and prepayment penalties.

(6) Interest before, during, and for a period following, the completion of any construction or improvement determined by the authority.

(7) Provisions for working capital.

(8) Reserves for principal and interest, and for extensions, enlargements, additions, replacements, renovations, and improvements.

(9) Engineering, architectural, financial, and legal services, plans, specifications, studies, surveys, estimates, administrative expenses, and other expenses necessary or incident to the construction, acquisition, or improvement of any project or any financing or refinancing under this chapter.
